Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 1016XG (6) 91 th/ns S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Section 1. ROAD USE TAX FUND ââ FY 2025-2026. There is 1 appropriated from the road use tax fund created in section 2 312.1 to the department of transportation for the fiscal year 3 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 4 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 5 purposes designated: 6 1. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 7 purposes: 8 a. Transportation operations: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 17,611,473 10 b. Motor vehicles: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 32,710,876 12 2. For payments to the department of administrative 13 services and the department of management for utility services: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 500,878 15 3. For unemployment compensation: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,000 17 4. For payments to the department of administrative 18 services for paying workersâ compensation claims under chapter 19 85 on behalf of employees of the department of transportation: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 153,679 21 5. For payment to the general fund of the state for indirect 22 cost recoveries: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 90,000 24 6. For reimbursement to the auditor of state for audit 25 expenses as provided in section 11.5B : 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 107,884 27 7. For automation, telecommunications, and related costs 28 associated with the county issuance of driverâs licenses and 29 vehicle registrations and titles: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,406,000 31 8. For costs associated with participation in the 32 Mississippi river parkway commission: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 40,000 34 9. For costs associated with the traffic and criminal 35 -1- LSB 1016XG (6) 91 th/ns 1/ 5 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ software program and the mobile architecture and communications 1 handling program: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 3 10. For motor vehicle division field facility maintenance 4 projects at various locations: 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 400,000 6 11. For costs associated with motor vehicle division 7 systems modernization: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 20,000,000 9 For purposes of section 8.33 , unless specifically provided 10 otherwise, moneys appropriated in subsections 10 and 11 that 11 remain unencumbered or unobligated shall not revert but shall 12 remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated 13 until the close of the fiscal year that ends three years 14 after the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation 15 was made. However, if the project or projects for which the 16 appropriation was made are completed in an earlier fiscal year, 17 unencumbered or unobligated moneys shall revert at the close of 18 that same fiscal year. 19 Sec. 2. PRIMARY ROAD FUND ââ FY 2025-2026. There is 20 appropriated from the primary road fund created in section 21 313.3 to the department of transportation for the fiscal year 22 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 23 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 24 purposes designated: 25 1. For transportation operations salaries, support, 26 maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $346,489,821 28 2. For payments to the department of administrative 29 services and the department of management for utility services: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,076,822 31 3. For unemployment compensation: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 138,000 33 4. For payments to the department of administrative 34 services for paying workersâ compensation claims under 35 -2- LSB 1016XG (6) 91 th/ns 2/ 5 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ chapter 85 on behalf of the employees of the department of 1 transportation: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,726,405 3 5. For payment to the general fund of the state for indirect 4 cost recoveries: 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 660,000 6 6. For reimbursement to the auditor of state for audit 7 expenses as provided in section 11.5B : 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 662,716 9 7. For inventory and equipment replacement: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 40,818,240 11 8. For costs associated with the statewide interoperability 12 network: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 442,162 14 9. For facility major maintenance and enhancement: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,300,000 16 10. For facility routine maintenance and preservation: 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,050,000 18 11. For renovation of the Waterloo maintenance garage: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 18,897,387 20 For purposes of section 8.33 , unless specifically provided 21 otherwise, moneys appropriated in subsections 9 through 11 that 22 remain unencumbered or unobligated shall not revert but shall 23 remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated 24 until the close of the fiscal year that ends three years after 25 the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation was 26 made. However, if the project or projects for which such 27 appropriation was made are completed in an earlier fiscal year, 28 unencumbered or unobligated moneys shall revert at the close of 29 that same fiscal year. 30 Sec. 3. Section 321.145, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 31 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 32 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (4) An amount necessary for the payment 33 of costs associated with producing and distributing driverâs 34 licenses and nonoperatorâs identification cards, not to exceed 35 -3- LSB 1016XG (6) 91 th/ns 3/ 5 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ revenues derived from fees charged for driverâs licenses and 1 nonoperatorâs identification cards, is appropriated to the 2 department for that purpose. 3